Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 2 Powers and Duties of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities

Cross references.

Juvenile Court disposition of mentally ill or mentally retarded child, Uniform Rules for the Juvenile Courts of Georgia, Rule 20.3.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).

37-1-20.
Obligations of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

The department shall:

Establish, administer, and supervise the state programs for mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases;

Direct, supervise, and control the medical and physical care and treatment; recovery; and social, employment, housing, and community supports and services based on single or co-occurring diagnoses provided by the institutions, contractors, and programs
under its control, management, or supervision;

Plan for and implement the coordination of mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease services with physical health services, and the prevention of any of these diseases or conditions, and develop and promulgate rules and regulations
to require that all health services be coordinated and that the public and private providers of any of these services that receive state support notify other providers of services to the same patients of the conditions, treatment,
and medication regimens each provider is prescribing and delivering;

Ensure that providers of mental health, developmental disability, or addictive disease services coordinate with providers of primary and specialty health care so that treatment of conditions of the brain and the body can be integrated to promote recovery,
health, and well-being;

Have authority to contract, including performance based contracts which may include financial incentives or consequences based on the results achieved by a contractor as measured by output, quality, or outcome measures, for services with community service
boards, private agencies, and other public entities for the provision of services within a service area so as to provide an adequate array of services and choice of providers for consumers and to comply with the applicable federal
laws and rules and regulations related to public or private hospitals; hospital authorities; medical schools and training and educational institutions; departments and agencies of this state; county or municipal governments; any
person, partnership, corporation, or association, whether public or private; and the United States government or the government of any other state;

Establish and support programs for the training of professional and technical personnel as well as regional advisory councils and community service boards;

Have authority to conduct research into the causes and treatment of disability and into the means of effectively promoting mental health and addictive disease recovery;

Assign specific responsibility to one or more units of the department for the development of a disability prevention program. The objectives of such program shall include, but are not limited to, monitoring of completed and ongoing research related to
the prevention of disability, implementation of programs known to be preventive, and testing, where practical, of those measures having a substantive potential for the prevention of disability;

Establish a system for local administration of mental health, developmental disability, and addictive disease services in institutions and in the community;

Make and administer budget allocations to fund the operation of mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases facilities and programs;

Coordinate in consultation with providers, professionals, and other experts the development of appropriate outcome measures for client centered service delivery systems;

Establish, operate, supervise, and staff programs and facilities for the treatment of disabilities throughout this state;

Disseminate information about available services and the facilities through which such services may be obtained;

Supervise the local office’s exercise of its responsibility concerning funding and delivery of disability services;

Supervise the local offices concerning the administration of grants, gifts, moneys, and donations for purposes pertaining to mental health, developmental disabilities, and addictive diseases;

Supervise the administration of contracts with any hospital, community service board, or any public or private providers without regard to regional or state boundaries for the provision of disability services and in making and entering into all contracts
necessary or incidental to the performance of the duties and functions of the department and the local offices;

Regulate the delivery of care, including behavioral interventions and medication administration by licensed staff, or certified staff as determined by the department, within residential settings serving only persons who are receiving services authorized
or financed, in whole or in part, by the department;

Classify host homes for persons whose services are financially supported, in whole or in part, by funds authorized through the department. As used in this Code section, the term ‘host home’ means a private residence in a residential area in which the
occupant owner or lessee provides housing and provides or arranges for the provision of food, one or more personal services, supports, care, or treatment exclusively for one or two persons who are not related to the occupant owner
or lessee by blood or marriage. A host home shall be occupied by the owner or lessee, who shall not be an employee of the same community provider that provides the host home services by contract with the department. The department
shall approve and enter into agreements with community providers which, in turn, shall contract with host homes. The occupant owner or lessee shall not be the guardian of any person served, the conservator of the property of such
person, the health care agent in such person’s advance directive for health care, or the mental health care agent in such person’s psychiatric advance directive. The placement determination for each person placed in a host home
shall be made according to such person’s choice as well as the individual needs of such person in accordance with the requirements of Code Section 37-3-162, 37-4-122, or 37-7-162, as applicable to such person;

Provide guidelines for and oversight of host homes, which may include, but not be limited to, criteria to become a host home, requirements relating to physical plants and supports, placement procedures, and ongoing oversight requirements;

Supervise the regular visitation of disability services facilities and programs in order to assure contracted providers are licensed and accredited by the designated agencies prescribed by the department, and in order to evaluate the effectiveness and
appropriateness of the services, as such services relate to the health, safety, and welfare of service recipients, and to provide technical assistance to programs in delivering services;

Establish a unit of the department which shall receive and consider complaints from individuals receiving services, make recommendations to the commissioner regarding such complaints, and ensure that the rights of individuals receiving services are fully
protected. No later than October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, such unit shall provide to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination annual reports regarding such complaints;

With respect to housing opportunities for persons with mental illness and co-occurring disorders:

Coordinate the department’s programs and services with other state agencies and housing providers;

Facilitate partnerships with local communities;

Educate the public on the need for supportive housing;

Collect information on the need for supportive housing and monitor the benefit of such housing;

Identify and determine best practices for the provision of services connected to housing; and

No later than October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, provide to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination an annual status report regarding successful housing placements and unmet housing needs for the previous year and anticipated housing needs
for the upcoming year;

Exercise all powers and duties provided for in this title or which may be deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this title;

Assign specific responsibility to one or more units of the department for the development of programs designed to serve disabled infants, children, and youth. To the extent permitted by law, such units shall cooperate with the Georgia Department of Education,
the University System of Georgia, the Technical College System of Georgia, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Department of Early Care and Learning, the Department of Public Health, and community service boards in developing
such programs. No later than October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, such department shall provide to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination annual reports regarding such programs;

Have the right to designate private institutions as state institutions; to contract with such private institutions for such activities, in carrying out this title, as the department may deem necessary from time to time; and to exercise such supervision
and cooperation in the operation of such designated private institutions as the department may deem necessary;

Establish policies and procedures governing fiscal standards and practices of community service boards and their respective governing boards and no later than October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, provide to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination
annual reports regarding the performance and fiscal status of each community service board;

Coordinate the establishment and operation of a data base and network to serve as a comprehensive management information system for behavioral health, addictive diseases, and disability services and programs; and

Establish the Multi-Agency Treatment for Children (MATCH) team within the department. The state MATCH team shall be composed of representatives from the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services; the Department of Juvenile
Justice; the Department of Early Care and Learning; the Department of Public Health; the Department of Community Health; the department; the Department of Education; the Office of the Child Advocate, and the Department of Corrections.
The chairperson of the Behavioral Health Coordinating Council or his or her designee shall serve as the chairperson of the state MATCH team. The state MATCH team shall facilitate collaboration across state agencies to explore resources
and solutions for complex and unmet treatment needs for children in this state and to provide for solutions, including both public and private providers, as necessary. The state MATCH team will accept referrals from local interagency
children’s committees throughout Georgia for children with complex treatment needs not met through the resources of their local community and custodians. The state agencies and entities represented on the state MATCH team shall
coordinate with each other and take all reasonable steps necessary to provide for collaboration and coordination to facilitate the purpose of the state MATCH team.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-601, 88-602, 88-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-603, enacted by Ga. L. 1976, p. 953, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 7; Ga. L. 2002,
p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 558, §§ 5, 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 263, § 2/SB 469; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 37/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2014, p. 309, § 1/SB 349; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1361, § 1/HB 512; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26,
§ 5-1/HB 1013; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-21/HB 752.

The 2022 amendments.

The first 2022 amendment, effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in paragraph (21); deleted “and” from the end of subparagraph (22)(D), added “and” at the end of subparagraph (22)(E), added subparagraph (22)(F); rewrote paragraph (24); substituted
“boards and no later than October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, provide to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination annual reports regarding the performance and fiscal status of each community service board;” for “boards;
and” in paragraph (26); substituted “for behavioral health, addictive diseases, and disability services and programs; and” for “for disability services and programs.” in paragraph (27); and added paragraph (28). The second 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (18), substituted “that” for “which” in the third sentence, substituted “shall contract” for “contract” in the fourth sentence, and rewrote the fifth sentence.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 37, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417
(1921).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-1-21.
Institutional powers and duties.

The department is designated and empowered as the agency of this state responsible for supervision and administrative control of: state facilities for the treatment of mental illness or the habilitation and treatment of individuals with developmental
disabilities; programs for the care, custody, and treatment of addictive disease; and other facilities, institutions, or programs which now or hereafter come under the supervision and administrative control of the department. With
respect to all such facilities, institutions, or programs the department shall have the following powers and duties:

To create all necessary offices, appoint and remove all officers of such facilities, institutions, or programs, prescribe and change the duties of such officers from time to time, and fix their salaries, other than the commissioner’s salary, as provided
for by the pay plan covering positions in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. The department shall discharge and cause to be prosecuted any officer or other person who shall assault any patient
in any of such facilities or institutions or who shall knowingly use toward any such patient any other or greater force than the occasion may require;

To refuse or accept and hold in trust for any such facility, institution, or program any grant or devise of land or bequest or donation of money or other property for the particular use specified or, if no use is specified, for the general use of such
facility, institution, or program;

To bring suit in its name for any claims which any such facility or institution may have, however arising;

To appoint police of such facilities, institutions, or programs who are authorized, while on the grounds or in the buildings of the respective facilities, institutions, or programs to make arrests with the same authority, power, privilege, and duties
as the sheriffs of the respective counties in which such facilities, institutions, or programs are situated; and

To have full authority to receive and treat patients ordered admitted to such facilities, institutions, or programs pursuant to any law, to receive any voluntary patients, to discharge such patients pursuant to law, to contract with patients or other
persons acting on behalf of patients or legally responsible therefor, and in general to exercise any power or function with respect to patients provided by law. It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide always
the highest quality of diagnosis, treatment, custody, and care consistent with medical, therapeutic, and habilitative evidence based practice and knowledge. It is the further intent of the General Assembly that the powers
and duties of the department with respect to patients shall be administered by persons properly trained professionally for the exercise of their duties, consistent with the intention expressed in this Code section.

The board is empowered to prescribe all rules and regulations for the management of such facilities, institutions, and programs not conflicting with the law.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-115, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 2/SB 244; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-57/HB 642.

Cross references.

Tuberculosis hospitals, T. 31, C. 14.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative
Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

37-1-22.
Redesignated.

Reserved.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 37(2), effective May 13, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 37-1-22 as present Code Section 37-1-40, and reserved the designation of this Code section.

37-1-23.
Rules of practice and procedure; availability.

The board is directed to prescribe rules of practice and procedure in order to implement this chapter. The department is directed to make the board’s and the department’s rules available for distribution.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 9; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Cross references.

County boards of health generally, T. 31, C. 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-1-24.
Use of psychologist or physician in lieu of one another.

No provision in this title shall require the department or any facility or private facility or any community service board to utilize a physician in lieu of a psychologist or a psychologist in lieu of a physician in performing functions under this title
even though this title authorizes either a physician or a psychologist to perform the function.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 7; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 enactment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

37-1-25.
Purchase of real property authorized.

The department is authorized to purchase land or lands adjacent to or near lands now under the control of the department where, in the opinion of the department, the land is needed for the benefit of one of the institutions under its control and management,
to pay for such land out of any funds which may be available for such purpose, and to take title to land so purchased in the name of the State of Georgia for the use of the department.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-26.
Sale of surplus products.

The department shall sell, to the best advantage, all surplus products of the Central State Hospital or other institutions under the control and supervision of the department and shall apply the proceeds thereof to the maintenance of the institution from
which such surplus products are received. Should any surplus funds arise from this source, they shall be paid into the state treasury annually; and the department shall, at the end of each quarter, make a detailed report of all
such transactions to the Governor.

It is not the intention of this Code section to encourage competition in any way by the state, its institutions, agencies, departments or branches, or other subdivisions with the individual, private farmers of this state, or others, in the production
and sale of agricultural or industrial commodities or products in due course of commerce.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228.

37-1-27.
Legislative findings; Suicide Prevention Program; implementation.

The General Assembly makes the following findings:

Every year in Georgia, approximately 850 people die from suicide;

More Georgians die from suicide than from homicide;

More teenagers and young adults die from suicide than from cancer, heart disease, AIDS, birth defects, stroke, pneumonia, influenza, and chronic lung disease combined;

Many who attempt suicide do not seek professional help after the attempt;

In Georgia, three out of four suicide deaths involve a firearm;

Factors such as aging, drug and alcohol abuse, unemployment, mental illness, isolation, and bullying in school contribute to causes of suicide; and

Education is necessary to inform the public about the causes of suicide and the early intervention programs that are available.

There is created the Suicide Prevention Program to be managed by the department.

The department, in implementing the Suicide Prevention Program, shall:

Establish a link between state agencies and offices, including but not limited to the Division of Aging Services and Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Public Health, local government agencies,
health care providers, hospitals, nursing homes, and jails to collect data on suicide deaths and attempted suicides;

Work with public officials to improve firearm safety;

Improve education for nurses, judges, physician assistants, social workers, psychologists, and other counselors with regard to suicide education and prevention and expand educational resources for professionals working with those persons most at risk
of suicide;

Provide training and minimal screening tools for clergy, teachers and other educational staff, and correctional workers on how to identify and respond to persons at risk of suicide;

Provide educational programs for family members of persons at an elevated risk of suicide;

Develop standardized protocols to be used by the department in reviewing suicide death scene investigations;

Work to increase the number of follow-back studies of suicides;

Work to increase the number of hospitals that code for external causes of injury;

Implement a state-wide reporting system for reporting suicides;

Support pilot projects to link and analyze information on self-destructive behavior from various, distinct data systems; and

Perform such other tasks as deemed appropriate to further suicide education and prevention in Georgia.

The Suicide Prevention Program shall coordinate with and receive technical assistance from epidemiologists and other staff of the Department of Public Health to support the research and outreach efforts related to this program.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-20/HB 214.

Cross references.

Training of public school personnel in suicide prevention and awareness; no duty of care imposed, §

20-2-779.1

.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

37-1-28.
Conviction data.

As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

The department may receive from any law enforcement agency conviction data that is relevant to a person whom the department or its contractors is considering as a final selectee for employment in a position the duties of which involve direct care, treatment,
custodial responsibilities, or any combination thereof for its clients. The department may also receive conviction data which is relevant to a person whom the department or its contractors is considering as a final selectee for
employment in a position if, in the judgment of the employer, a final employment decision regarding the selectee can only be made by a review of conviction data in relation to the particular duties of the position and the security
and safety of clients, the general public, or other employees.

The department shall establish a uniform method of obtaining conviction data under subsection (a) of this Code section which shall be applicable to the department and its contractors. Such uniform method shall require the submission to the Georgia Crime
Information Center of fingerprints and the records search fee in accordance with Code Section 35-3-35. Upon receipt thereof, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. After receiving the fingerprints and fee, the Georgia Crime Information Center
shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check or if there is no such finding.

All conviction data received shall be for the exclusive purpose of making employment decisions or decisions concerning individuals in the care of the department and shall be privileged and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person
or agency. Immediately following the employment decisions or upon receipt of the conviction data, all such conviction data collected by the department or its agent shall be maintained by the department or agent pursuant to laws
regarding and the rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any conviction data shall be as prescribed
pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as is applicable.

The department may promulgate written rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

The department shall be authorized to conduct a name or descriptor based check of any person’s criminal history information, including arrest and conviction data, and other information from the Georgia Crime Information Center regarding any adult person
who provides care or is in contact with persons under the care of the department without the consent of such person and without fingerprint comparison to the fullest extent permissible by federal and state law.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to
this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 3/SB 244; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-11/SB 336.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2018).

37-1-29.
Crisis stabilization unit defined; certification of units; minimum standards and requirements; designation as an emergency receiving facility; legislative intent.

As used in this Code section, the term “crisis stabilization unit” means a short-term residential program operated for the purpose of providing psychiatric stabilization and detoxification services that complies with applicable department standards and
that provides brief, intensive crisis services 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

The department shall be authorized to certify crisis stabilization units pursuant to this Code section for the purpose of providing psychiatric stabilization and detoxification services in a community based setting rather than inpatient hospitalization
and other higher levels of care.

The department shall establish minimum standards and requirements for the certification of crisis stabilization units in its policies and procedures. Following any changes to such policies and procedures pertaining to crisis stabilization units, notification
of such changes shall be posted on the department’s website within 45 days and shall remain posted on the website for at least six months. Such policies and procedures shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The capacity to carry out emergency receiving and evaluating functions;

Voluntary and involuntary admission criteria;

The prohibition to hold itself out as a hospital or bill for hospital or inpatient services;

The unit is operated by an accredited and licensed, if applicable, health care authority;

The unit has operating agreements with private and public inpatient hospitals and treatment facilities;

The unit operates within the guidelines of the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act with respect to stabilization and transfer of clients;

Length of stay;

Designation of transitional beds;

Billing;

Physician and registered professional nurse oversight;

Staff to client ratios;

Patient restraint or seclusion;

Safety and emergency protocols;

Pharmacy services;

Medication administration; and

Reporting requirements.

A crisis stabilization unit shall be designated as an emergency receiving facility under Code Sections 37-3-40 and 37-7-40 and an evaluation facility under Code Sections 37-3-60 and 37-7-60, but shall not be designated as a treatment facility under Code
Section 37-3-80 or 37-7-80. Crisis stabilization units may admit individuals on a voluntary basis. Individuals may be provided 24 hour observation, detoxification and stabilization services, medication prescribed by a physician,
and other appropriate treatment or services.

No entity shall operate as a crisis stabilization unit without having a valid certificate issued pursuant to this Code section.

Application for a certificate to operate a crisis stabilization unit shall be submitted to the department in the manner prescribed by the department’s policies and procedures.

The department shall issue a certificate to an applicant who meets all the standards and requirements as set forth in the department’s policies and procedures for the certification of crisis stabilization units. The certificate shall be nontransferable
for a change of location or governing body.

Each certified crisis stabilization unit shall permit authorized department representatives to enter upon and inspect any and all premises for which a certificate has been granted or applied for.

The department may deny any application for certification which does not meet all the standards and requirements set forth in the department’s policies and procedures for the certification of crisis stabilization units and may suspend or revoke a certification
which has been issued if an applicant or a certified crisis stabilization unit violates any such policies and procedures; provided, however, that before any order is entered denying a certification application or suspending or
revoking a certification previously granted, the applicant or certificate holder, as the case may be, shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure
Act.”

Any program certified as a crisis stabilization unit pursuant to this Code section shall be exempt from the requirements to obtain a certificate of need pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 6 of Title 31.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that this Code section provide a public benefit and comply with all safety net obligations in this title and that patients without private health care coverage receive priority consideration for crisis stabilization
unit placement.

History. Code 1981, §

37-1-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 346, § 1/HB 343; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1062, § 1/SB 131.